Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1084.
do enact as follows:SB1084,14Section 1. 23.15 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB1084,2,2523.15 (1m) Notwithstanding sub. (1), the natural resources board may sell 6lands that are owned by the state under the jurisdiction of the department of 1natural resources and that are adjacent to or within one mile of a commercial egg 2farm to prevent the spread of avian flu.SB1084,2,33